Hawaii statutes.
[§321-11.9] Dental health
facilities; health care facilities; use of latex gloves. [Section
effective January 1, 2017.] All personnel working in dental health
facilities or health care facilities, including all facilities listed in
section 321-11(10), shall be prohibited from using latex gloves for patient
care where the patient is unconscious or otherwise physically unable to
communicate. Where the patient is conscious and physically able to
communicate, latex gloves may be used if the patient affirmatively states that
the patient is not allergic to latex. [L 2016, c 180, §2]

Cross References

Emergency medical services; use of latex gloves
prohibited, see §321-236.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next